Illinois, session 104th, SB1719.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Records Act is amended by adding 5Section 22 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 205/22 new)7    Sec. 22. Electronic storage. A unit of local government 8required to store public records under this Act may satisfy 9the requirements of this Act by storing the public records in 10an electronic form.